Tennessee statutes. Title 63 Professions Of The Healing Arts
Part 3 Licensure of Physical Therapists and Assistants
63-13-312. Denial, suspension or revocation of licenses.

The board has the power, and it shall be its duty, to deny, suspend or revoke the license of, or to otherwise lawfully discipline, a licensee who is guilty of violating any of this part or is guilty of the following acts or offenses:

Practicing physical therapy in violation of this chapter or any rule or written order adopted by the board;

Practicing or offering to practice beyond the scope of physical therapy practice as defined in this chapter;

Making false or misleading statements or representations, being guilty of fraud or deceit in obtaining admission to practice or being guilty of fraud or deceit in the licensee's practice;

Engaging in the performance of substandard care by a physical therapist due to ignorance, incompetence or a deliberate or negligent act or failure to act, regardless of whether actual injury to the patient is established;

Engaging in the performance of substandard care by a physical therapist assistant, which includes exceeding the authority to perform the task selected and delegated by the supervising physical therapist, regardless of whether actual injury to the patient is established;

Inadequately supervising or delegating duties that exceed the scope of practice for assistive personnel in accordance with this chapter and rules adopted by the board;

Conviction of a felony or any offense involving moral turpitude in the courts of this state or any other state, territory or country. “Conviction,” as used in this subdivision (a)(7), includes a finding or verdict of guilt or a plea of nolo contendere;

Practicing as a physical therapist or working as a physical therapist assistant when physical or mental abilities are impaired by the use of controlled substances, controlled substance analogues, other habit-forming drugs, chemicals or alcohol;

Disciplinary action against a person licensed to practice as a physical therapist or physical therapist assistant by another state or territory of the United States for any acts or omissions that would constitute grounds for discipline of a person licensed in this state. A certified copy of the initial or final order or other equivalent document shall constitute prima facie evidence of a violation of this section and be sufficient grounds upon which to deny, restrict or condition licensure or renewal and/or discipline a person licensed in this state;

Engaging in sexual misconduct. “Sexual misconduct,” for the purpose of this section, includes:

Engaging in or soliciting sexual relationships, whether consensual or nonconsensual, while a physical therapist or physical therapist assistant/patient relationship exists;

Making sexual advances, requesting sexual favors and engaging in other verbal conduct or physical conduct or physical contact of a sexual nature with patients; and

Intentionally viewing a completely or partially disrobed patient in the course of treatment, if the viewing is not related to patient diagnosis or treatment under current practice standards;

Directly or indirectly requesting, receiving or participating in the dividing, transferring, assigning, rebating or refunding of an unearned fee or profiting by means of a credit or other valuable consideration, such as an unearned commission, discount or gratuity in connection with the furnishing of physical therapy services. Nothing in this subdivision (a)(11) prohibits the members of any regularly and properly organized business entity recognized by law and comprised of physical therapists from dividing fees received for professional services among themselves as they determine necessary to defray their joint operating expenses. Physical therapists employed by or contracting with a physician, physician group, as defined in accordance with the federal Physician Self-Referral Law (42 U.S.C. § 1395nn), or entity primarily owned by physicians and receiving wages or other compensation and/or benefits pursuant to the employment or contract shall not be deemed to be in violation of any provision under this chapter solely by virtue of the employment or contract and shall not be subject to licensure denial, suspension, revocation or any other disciplinary action or other penalty described under this chapter solely by virtue of the employment or contract. This subdivision (a)(11) shall not be interpreted in such a way as to create a prohibition on the corporate practice of any health care professional where no such prohibition previously existed;

Failing to adhere to standards of ethics of the physical therapy profession;

Charging unreasonable or fraudulent fees for services performed or not performed;

Making misleading, deceptive, untrue or fraudulent representations in violation of this chapter, or otherwise, in practice of the profession;

Being under a current judgment of mental incompetency rendered by a court of competent jurisdiction;

Aiding or abetting a person not licensed in this state who directly or indirectly performs activities requiring a license;

Failing to report to the board any act or omission of a licensee, applicant or any other person which violates this chapter;

Interfering with, or refusing to cooperate in, an investigation or disciplinary proceeding, including willful misrepresentation of facts or by the use of threats or harassment against any patient or witness to prevent the patient or witness from providing evidence in a disciplinary proceeding or any legal action;

Failing to maintain patient confidentiality without prior written consent or unless otherwise required by law;

Failing to maintain adequate patient records that contain a minimum of an evaluation of objective finding, a physical therapy treatment diagnosis, the plan of care including desired outcomes, the treatment record, a discharge plan including results of intervention and sufficient information to identify the patient;

Promoting unnecessary devices, treatment intervention or service for the financial gain of the practitioner or of a third party;

Providing treatment intervention unwarranted by the condition of the patient, nor shall the licensee continue treatment beyond the point of reasonable benefit;

A violation or attempted violation, directly or indirectly, or assisting in or abetting the violation of or conspiring to violate any provisions of this chapter or any lawful order of the board issued pursuant thereto or any criminal statute of this state;

Division of fees or agreeing to split fees or divide fees received for professional services with any person for bringing or referring a patient outside the scope of § 63-13-315;

Payment or acceptance of commissions, in any form or manner, on fees for professional services, references, consultations, pathological reports, prescriptions or on other services or articles supplied to patients;

Acting in a manner inconsistent with generally accepted standards of physical therapy practice; or

Practicing physical therapy with a mental or physical condition that impairs the ability of the licensee to practice with skill and safety.

An action taken under this section shall be subject to the applicable provisions of the Fresh Start Act that are compiled in chapter 1, part 1 of this title.

Acts 1999, ch. 528, § 23; 2006, ch. 875, § 3; 2007, ch. 115, § 10; 2012, ch. 848, § 78; 2018, ch. 745, § 31; 2020, ch. 790, § 14.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 3, §§ 63-13-301 — 63-13-313, was transferred to part 2 of this chapter in 1986.

Acts 2020, ch. 790, § 17 provided that the act, which amended this section, applies to actions occurring on or after July 15, 2020.

Amendments. The 2018 amendment added (b).

The 2020 amendment added (a)(26) and (a)(27).

Effective Dates. Acts 2018, ch. 745, § 46. July 1, 2018.

Acts 2020, ch. 790, § 17. July 15, 2020.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, § 10-7-504.

Grounds for license denial, suspension or revocation, § 63-6-214.

63-13-313. Disciplinary actions of the board.

The board may, upon proof of the violation of any provision of this chapter, take the following disciplinary actions singly or in combination:

Deny an application for a license to any applicant who applies for the same through reciprocity or otherwise;

Permanently or temporarily withhold issuance of a license;

Suspend, limit or restrict a previously issued license for such time and in such manner as the board may determine;

Issue a letter of reprimand;

Reprimand or take such action in relation to disciplining an applicant or licensee, including, but not limited to, informal settlements and letters of warning as the board, in its discretion, may deem proper;

Revoke a license;

Refuse to issue or renew a license; or

Impose civil penalties for violation of this chapter pursuant to § 63-1-134. In addition, the board may, in its discretion, assess and collect the reasonable costs incurred in a disciplinary hearing when action is taken against a person's license.

Acts 1999, ch. 528, § 25; 2007, ch. 115, § 10.

Compiler's Notes. Former part 3, §§ 63-13-301 — 63-13-313, was transferred to part 2 of this chapter in 1986.

Attorney General Opinions. Authority of physical therapy board as to chiropractor advertising “physical therapy” services where the services offered are not performed by or under direction of licensed physical therapist. OAG 12-27, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 27 (2/29/12).

63-13-314. Administrative procedure for disciplinary actions — Jurisdiction of board.

All proceedings for disciplinary action against a licensee shall be conducted in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

The board retains jurisdiction to modify or refuse to modify, upon request of any party, any of its orders issued pursuant to this section.

Acts 1999, ch. 528, § 26; 2007, ch. 115, § 10.

63-13-315. Penalties.

A person commits a Class B misdemeanor if the person engages in an activity requiring a license issued according to this chapter and who fails to obtain the required license, who violates any other provision of this chapter or who uses any word, title, or representation implying that the person is licensed to engage in the practice of physical therapy. A person claims to be a physical therapist when using a title, letters or any description of services that incorporates one (1) or more of the terms, designations or abbreviations specifically restricted under §§ 63-13-103 and 63-13-310.

The board may authorize an investigation of any person to the extent necessary to determine if the person is engaged in the unlawful practice of physical therapy.

The board may, through the office of the attorney general and reporter, apply for injunctive relief in any court of competent jurisdiction to enjoin any person from committing an act in violation of this chapter. Injunctive proceedings are in addition to, and not in lieu of, all penalties and other remedies prescribed in this chapter.

A person who aids or requires another person to directly or indirectly violate this chapter or rules, who permits the person's license or a license issued by this board to be used by any person other than the licensee or who acts with the intent to violate or evade this chapter or rules is subject to a civil penalty of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) for each violation.

Acts 1999, ch. 528, § 27.

Cross-References. Enjoining violations, § 63-1-121.

Payment of costs of investigation and prosecution, § 63-1-144.

Penalties, § 63-1-123.

Penalties for violation of statute, rule or order, recovery, § 63-1-134.

Penalty for Class B misdemeanor, § 40-35-111.

Attorney General Opinions. Authority of physical therapy board as to chiropractor advertising “physical therapy” services where the services offered are not performed by or under direction of licensed physical therapist. OAG 12-27, 2012 Tenn. AG LEXIS 27 (2/29/12).

63-13-316. Peer assistance program — Fees.

In lieu of a disciplinary proceeding as set forth in this chapter, the board may permit a licensee pursuant to this part to actively participate in a board approved peer assistance program under the following conditions:

The board has evidence that the licensee is impaired;

The licensee has not been convicted of a felony relating to a controlled substance or controlled substance analogue in a court of law of the United States or any other territory or country;

The licensee enters into a written agreement with the board for a restricted license and complies with all the terms of the agreement, including making satisfactory progress in the program and adhering to any limitations on the licensee's practice imposed by the board to protect the public. Failure to enter into such an agreement shall activate an immediate investigation and disciplinary proceeding by the board; and

As part of the agreement established between the licensee and the board, the licensee shall sign a waiver allowing the peer assistance program to release information to the board if the licensee does not comply with the requirements of this section or is unable to practice with reasonable skill or safety.

The board shall establish fees for all licensees to effect the purposes of this section.

Acts 1999, ch. 528, § 28; 2007, ch. 115, § 10; 2012, ch. 848, § 79.

63-13-317. Disclosures to patient — Confidentiality of information — Complaints — Display of license.

Physical therapists shall inform the patient of any financial arrangements connected to the referral process.

Physical therapists shall disclose in writing any financial interest in products they endorse and recommend to their patients.

The licensee has the responsibility to ensure that the patient has knowledge of freedom of choice in services and products.

Information relating to the physical therapist-patient relationship is confidential and may not be communicated to a third party not involved in that patient's care without the prior written consent of the patient. The physical therapist-patient confidentiality does not extend to cases in which the physical therapist has a duty to report information as required by law.

Any person may submit a complaint regarding any licensee or any other person potentially in violation of this chapter. Confidentiality shall be maintained subject to law.

The department shall keep all information relating to the receiving and investigation of complaints filed against licensees confidential until the information becomes public record as required by law.

Each licensee shall display a copy of the licensee's license or current renewal verification in a location accessible to public view at the licensee's place of employment.

Acts 1999, ch. 528, § 29.

Cross-References. Confidentiality of public records, § 10-7-504.

Display of license or registration certificate, § 63-1-109.

63-13-318. Board of physical therapy.

There is created a board of physical therapy, which shall perform the same functions and have the same duties and responsibilities that were performed by the committee of physical therapy prior to July 1, 2007.

The board shall consist of five (5) members appointed by the governor, each of whom shall be a resident of this state. Three (3) members of the board shall be licensed physical therapists who have had at least five (5) years of experience in the actual practice or teaching of physical therapy immediately preceding their appointment. One (1) member of the board shall be a licensed physical therapist assistant who has had at least five (5) years of experience in the actual performance of physical therapy procedures and related tasks or teaching of a physical therapist assistant curriculum immediately preceding the appointment. One (1) member of the board shall be a person who is not engaged in the practice of physical therapy and who is not professionally or commercially associated with the health care industry.

The physical therapist and physical therapist assistant members may be appointed by the governor from lists of nominees submitted by interested physical therapy groups, including, but not limited to, the Tennessee Physical Therapy Association. The governor shall consult with the interested physical therapy groups to determine qualified persons to fill positions on the board.

The physical therapists and the physical therapist assistant who are serving on the committee of physical therapy on July 1, 2007, shall continue to serve as members of the board until the expiration of their terms.

The board shall organize annually and select a chair and a secretary. Meetings shall be held as frequently as may be required.

A quorum of the board shall consist of at least three (3) members.

The division shall provide administrative, investigatory and clerical services to the board.

Each member of the board shall be reimbursed for actual expenses incurred in the performance of official duties on the board and shall be entitled to a per diem of one hundred dollars ($100) for each day of service in conducting the business of the board. All reimbursement for travel expenses shall be in accordance with the comprehensive travel regulations promulgated by the department of finance and administration and approved by the attorney general and reporter.

All regular appointments to the board shall be for terms of three (3) years each. Each member shall serve until a successor is appointed. Vacancies shall be filled by appointment of the governor for the remainder of the unexpired term.

The governor may, at the request of the board, remove any member of the board for misconduct, incompetence or neglect of duty.

In making appointments to the board, the governor shall strive to ensure that at least one (1) member is fifty-five (55) years of age or older, that at least one (1) member is a racial minority, and that the gender balance of the board reflects the gender balance of the state's population.

After July 1, 2007, the board shall assume and fulfill all powers and duties previously assigned to the committee of physical therapy, and the rules adopted by the committee of physical therapy shall become the rules of the board without further action by the board.

Acts 2007, ch. 115, § 11. 2014, ch. 600, § 3; 2017, ch. 211, § 2; 2020, ch. 790, § 15.

Compiler's Notes. The board of physical therapy, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2025. See §§ 4-29-112, 4-29-246

Acts 2016, ch. 810, § 2 provided that the chair of the board of physical therapy selected pursuant to § 63-13-318(e) shall notify the government operations committee of the senate and the government operations committee of the house of representatives within thirty (30) days of the date the Physical Therapy Licensure Compact comes into effect as provided in Section 11 of the compact (Section 11 of the compact is codified at § 63-13-402.)

Acts 2020, ch. 790, § 17 provided that the act, which amended this section, applies to actions occurring on or after July 15, 2020.

Amendments. The 2017 amendment, in (c), substituted “may be appointed” for “shall be appointed” in the first sentence, and substituted “with the interested physical therapy groups” for “with such interested groups” in the second sentence.

The 2020 amendment substituted “fifty-five (55) years of age” for “sixty (60) years of age” in (k).

Effective Dates. Acts 2017, ch. 211, § 4. April 28, 2017.

Acts 2020, ch. 790, § 17. July 15, 2020.